North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54. Cooperative Organizations.
Article 14A. Formation of Credit Union.

§ 54-109.1.
Definition and purposes.

A credit union is a cooperative, nonprofit association, incorporated under Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter, for the purposes of encouraging thrift among its members, creating a source of credit at a fair and reasonable rate of interest, and providing an opportunity for its members to use and control their own money in order to improve their economic and social condition.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.2.
Organization procedure.

Any 12 or more residents of this State, of legal age, who have a common bond referred to in

G.S. 54-109.26

may make application to organize a credit union and become charter members thereof by complying with this section.

The subscribers shall execute in duplicate articles of incorporation and agree to the terms thereof, which articles shall state:

The name, which shall include the words “credit union” and which shall not be the same as that of any other existing credit union in this State, and the location where the proposed credit union is to have its principal place of business;

That the existence of the credit union shall be perpetual;

The initial par value of the shares of the credit union.

The names and addresses of the subscribers to the articles of incorporation, and the value of shares subscribed to by each, which shall be not less than five dollars ($5.00); and

That the credit union may exercise such incidental powers as are necessary or requisite to enable it to carry on effectively the business for which it is incorporated, and those powers which are inherent in the credit union as a legal entity.

The subscribers shall prepare and adopt bylaws for the general government of the credit union, consistent with Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter, and execute the same in duplicate.

They shall select at least five qualified persons who agree to serve on the board of directors, and at least three qualified persons who agree to serve on the supervisory committee. A signed agreement to serve in these capacities until the first annual meeting or until the election of their successors, whichever is later, shall be executed by those who so agree. This agreement shall be submitted to the administrator of credit unions.

The subscribers shall forward the required charter fee and an investigation fee, as prescribed by the Credit Union Commission, and the articles of incorporation and the bylaws to the Administrator of the Credit Union Division. The Administrator may issue a certificate of approval if the articles and the bylaws are in conformity with Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter and he is satisfied that the proposed field of operation is favorable to the success of such credit union and that the standing of the proposed organizers is such as to give assurance that its affairs will be properly administered. He shall issue to the corporation a certificate of approval, annexed to a duplicate certificate of incorporation and of the bylaws, which certificate of approval, together with the attached duplicate certificate of incorporation, shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the office of such credit union is situated, and upon recordation of the incorporators shall become and be a corporation for the purposes set forth in this Article. The register of deeds of the county in which such recordation is made shall charge the same fee for such recordation as he is now allowed to charge for handling and recording a certificate of incorporation of a corporation organized under the business corporation laws of this State. The application shall be acted upon within 30 days.

History.

1915, c. 115, ss. 2, 9; C.S., ss. 5210, 5211, 5233; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1965, c. 956, ss. 1, 4, 19; 1973, c. 199, s. 8; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1983, c. 568, s. 1.

§ 54-109.3.
Form of articles and bylaws.

In order to simplify the organization of credit unions, the Administrator of Credit Unions shall cause to be prepared a form of articles of incorporation and a form of bylaws, consistent with Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter, which may be used by credit union incorporators for their guidance. Such articles of incorporation and bylaws shall provide:

The name of corporation.

The purposes for which it is formed.

Qualifications for membership.

The date of the annual meeting; the manner in which members shall be notified of meetings; the manner of conducting the meetings; the number of members which constitute a quorum at the meetings, and the regulations as to voting.

The number of members of the board of directors, their powers and duties, and the compensation and duties of officers elected by the board of directors, and frequency of meetings.

The number of members of the credit committee, if any, their powers and duties.

The number of members of the supervisory committee, if any, their powers and duties.

The par value of shares of capital stock.

The conditions upon which shares may be issued, paid in, transferred, and withdrawn.

The fines, if any, which shall be charged for failure to meet obligations to the corporation punctually.

The conditions upon which deposits may be received and withdrawn. Whether the proposed corporation shall, in addition, have power to borrow funds.

The manner in which the funds of the corporation shall be invested.

The conditions upon which loans may be made and repaid.

The maximum rate of interest that may be charged upon loans, not to exceed, however, the legal rate.

The method of receipting for money paid on account of shares, deposits, or loans.

The manner in which the reserve fund shall be accumulated.

The manner in which dividends shall be determined and paid to members.

The manner in which a voluntary dissolution of the corporation shall be effected.

The manner in which the bylaws and articles of incorporation may be amended.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 2; C.S., s. 5211; 1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.4.
Amendments.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may be amended as provided in the bylaws. Amendments to the articles of incorporation or bylaws shall be submitted to the Administrator of Credit Unions who shall approve or disapprove the amendments within 60 days.

Amendments shall become effective upon approval in writing by the Administrator and no fee shall be charged for such approval.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 3; C.S., s. 5213; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1965, c. 956, s. 6; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.5.
Use of name exclusive.

With the exception of a credit union organized under the provisions of Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter or of any other credit union act, or an association of credit unions or a recognized chapter thereof, any person, corporation, copartnership or association using a name or title containing the words “credit union” or any derivation thereof or representing themselves in their advertising or otherwise as conducting business as a credit union shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, and may be permanently enjoined from using such words in its name.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 4; C.S., s. 5214; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1941, c. 236; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 428; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 54-109.6.
Office facilities.

A credit union may maintain service facilities at locations other than its main office if the maintenance of such offices is reasonably necessary to furnish service to its members, subject to the approval of the Administrator of Credit Unions.

A credit union may change its place of business within this State upon written notice to the Credit Union Division. Such a change shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds where its office was located, and a second duplicate in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the new office is to be located, if same is changed to another county. If the change is from one location to another in the same county, then only the Administrator of Credit Unions need be notified.

A credit union may share office space with one or more credit unions and contract with any person or corporation to provide facilities or personnel.

History.

1915, c. 115, ss. 9, 25; C.S., ss. 5215, 5233; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1965, c. 956, ss. 1, 7, 19; 1967, c. 823, s. 10; 1973, c. 199, s. 8; c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.7.
Conducting business outside this State.

A credit union incorporated under this Subchapter may conduct business outside of this State in any state where it is permitted to conduct business as a credit union.

History.

1991, c. 651, s. 1.

§§ 54-109.8,
54-109.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.